District of Columbia statutes.
44-659

Applicability date; sunset.

(a)

This chapter shall apply as of May 1, 2013.

(b)

This chapter shall sunset as of September 30, 2014.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5080, 60 DCR 12472
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
Section 5071 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle H of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Medicaid Hospital Outpatient Supplemental Payment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5080 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).